Utah statutes.
63G-6-810.   Jurisdiction of Procurement Appeals Board.

Unless an action has been initiated previously in district courts for essentially the same cause of action, the board shall have jurisdiction to review and determine de novo:

(1)  any protest of a solicitation or award of a contract addressed to the board by an aggrieved actual or prospective bidder or offeror, or a contractor; and

(2)  any appeal by an aggrieved party from a decision rendered or considered to have been rendered pursuant to Section 63G-6-806.

